Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-4,130.03
Operator less than twenty-one years of age; driver improvement course; suspension; reinstatement.

(1) Any person less than twenty-one years of age who holds an operator's license or a provisional operator's permit and who has accumulated, within any twelve-month period, a total of six or more points on his or her driving record pursuant to section 60-4,182 shall be notified by the Department of Motor Vehicles of that fact and ordered to attend and successfully complete a driver improvement course consisting of at least four hours of department-approved instruction. Notice shall be sent by regular United States mail to the last-known address as shown in the records of the department. If such person fails to complete the driver improvement course within three months after the date of notification, he or she shall have his or her operator's license suspended by the department.

(2) The director shall issue an order summarily suspending an operator's license until the licensee turns twenty-one years of age. Such order shall be sent by regular United States mail to the last-known address as shown in the records of the department. Such person shall not have his or her operator's license reinstated until he or she (a) has successfully completed the driver improvement course or has attained the age of twenty-one years and (b) has complied with section 60-4,100.01.

Laws 1998, LB 320, § 14;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 35;

Laws 2012, LB751, § 31;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 56.